District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2211

Penalty for illegal practice or use of title.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-172, § 12, 33 DCR 7211
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 16, 38 DCR 314
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1232, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-3411.